nb: Maskinvare > Drivstoffbeholdere og -tanker: Dieselkanner; Drivstoffoverføringstanker; Bensinkanner; Parafinkanner; Propantanker
es: Bricolaje > Depósitos y tanques de combustible: Latas de diésel; Tanques de transferencia de combustible; Latas de gasolina; Latas de queroseno; Tanques de propano
en: Hardware > Fuel Containers & Tanks: Diesel Cans; Fuel Transfer Tanks; Gas Cans; Kerosene Cans; Propane Tanks
ro-RO: Feronerie > Recipiente și rezervoare de combustibil: Bidoane pentru motorină; Rezervoare pentru transfer de combustibil; Bidoane pentru gaz; Bidoane pentru kerosen; Rezervoare pentru propan
pl: Sprzęt > Pojemniki i zbiorniki na paliwo: Kanistry na olej napędowy; Zbiorniki do przelewania paliwa; Butle gazowe; Pojemniki na naftę; Zbiorniki na propan
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Posode in rezervoarji za gorivo: Posode za dizelsko gorivo; Prenosni rezervoarji za gorivo; Plinski rezervoarji; Posode za kerozin; Rezervoarji za propan
fr: Quincaillerie > Conteneurs et citernes pour combustible: Bidons de diesel; Réservoirs de transfert de carburant; Bidons d’essence; Bidons de kérosène; Réservoirs de propane
vi: Phần cứng > Thùng và bình đựng nhiên liệu: Thùng Diesel; Thùng chuyển nhiên liệu; Thùng xăng; Thùng dầu hỏa; Thùng propan
bg-BG: Железария > Контейнери и резервоари за гориво: Туби за дизел; Резервоари за прехвърляне на гориво; Туби за газ; Туби за керосин; Резервоари за пропан
ko: 철물 > 연료 컨테이너/탱크: 디젤 용기; 연료 운반용 탱크; 휘발유 용기; 등유 용기; 프로판 탱크
ja: DIY用品 > 燃料容器・タンク: ディーゼル缶; 燃料移送タンク; ガス缶; 灯油缶; プロパンタンク
pt-BR: Ferragens > Contêineres e tanques de combustível: Latas de diesel; Tanques de transferência de combustível; Latas de gasolina; Latas de querosene; Tanques de propano
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Serbatoi e contenitori per carburante: Barattoli di diesel; Serbatoi di trasferimento carburante; Bombole di gas; Barattoli di cherosene; Serbatoi di propano
tr: Hırdavat > Yakıt Kapları ve Tankları: Dizel Kutuları; Akaryakıt Transfer Tankları; Benzin Kutuları; Kerosen Kutuları; Propan Tankları
sk-SK: Náradie > Nádrže na palivo: Kanistre na naftu; Nádrže na prepravu paliva; Kanistre na plyn; Kanistre na petrolej; Nádrže na propán
pt-PT: Equipamento > Contentores e tanques de combustível: Latas Diesel; Tanques de transferência de combustível; Latas de gás; Latas de querosene; Tanques de propano
fi: Rakentaminen > Polttoainesäiliöt ja -tankit: Dieselkannut; Polttoaineen siirtosäiliöt; Kaasukannut; Keroseenikannut; Propaanisäiliöt
sv: Metallprodukter > Bränslekärl och -tankar: Dieselburkar; Bränsleöverföringstankar; Gasburkar; Fotogenburkar; Propantankar
zh-TW: 硬體 > 瓦斯容器: 柴油桶; 燃料運輸桶; 汽油桶; 煤油桶; 丙烷桶
da: Isenkram > Benzinbeholdere: Dieseldåser; Brændstofoverførselstanke; Benzindåser; Petroleumsdåser; Propantanke
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Δοχεία & δεξαμενές καυσίμων: Δοχεία πετρελαίου; Δεξαμενές μεταφοράς καυσίμων; Δοχεία βενζίνης; Δοχεία κηροζίνης; Δεξαμενές προπανίου
hr-HR: Željezarija > Spremnici i rezervoari za gorivo: Kanistri dizela; Spremnici za prijenos goriva; Kanistri plina; Kanistri kerozina; Spremnici za propan
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ที่จัดเก็บและถังน้ำมัน: ถังน้ำมันดีเซล; ถังถ่ายน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง; ถังแก๊ส; ถังมันก๊าด; ถังโพรเพน
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 燃料罐/箱: 柴油罐; 燃料输送罐; 煤气罐; 煤油罐; 丙烷罐
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Brennstoffbehälter & -tanks: Dieselkanister; Kraftstoffumpumptanks; Benzinkanister; Kerosinkanister; Propantanks
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gastanks: Dieselblikken; Gasoverdrachtstanks; Gasblikken; Kerosineblikken; Propaantanks
hu: Hardver > Üzemanyag-tartályok: Dízelkannák; Üzemanyag-átrakó tartályok; Gázkannák; Kerozinkannák; Propántartályok
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Емкости для топлива: Канистры для дизельного топлива; Переносные топливные баки; Канистры для бензина; Канистры для керосина; Газгольдеры
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Kuro indai ir bakai: Dyzelino kanistrai; Kuro perpylimo bakai; Benzino kanistrai; Žibalo kanistrai; Propano balionai
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nádrže a nádoby na palivo: Kanystry na naftu; Přečerpávací nádrže na pohonné hmoty; Kanystry na benzín; Kanystry na kerosín; Nádrže na propan